Montana, session 2025, HB843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Purpose. The purpose of [this act] is to provide state funds to
supplement federal funds received from the emergency solutions grant program for the rapid rehousing of
individuals experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Eligible use of funds -- distribution. (1) Funds appropriated to the
department of public health and human services in [section 3] may only be used for the purposes of the rapid
rehousing assistance component provided in 24 CFR 576.104 of the federal emergency solutions grant
program and this section.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), funds appropriated in [section 3] must be
distributed in the same manner as funds currently awarded and distributed for the same purpose under the
emergency solutions grant program provided for in 24 CFR, part 576.
(b) Funds may be used for rental assistance:
(i) at a rate of up to 150% of the fair market rent as determined in 24 CFR 888.113 by the federal
department of housing and urban development; and
(ii) for program participants who have an annual income below 80% of the area median income as
determined by the federal department of housing and urban development.
(3) The entirety of the funds appropriated each fiscal year pursuant to [section 3] must be
distributed by the last day of the respective fiscal year.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 843

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 843.1
NEW SECTION. Section 3. Appropriation. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, there is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of public health and human services the following
amounts to be distributed as provided in [section 2] for the purposes described in [sections 1 and 2]:
Fiscal year 2025 $1 million
Fiscal year 2026 $1 million

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 843